New York, session 2025-2026, A8219.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (c) of subdivision 3 of 2 section 441 of the real property law, as amended by chapter 697 of the 3 laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) The secretary of state shall promulgate rules establishing the 5 method, content, setting and supervision requirements of the continuing 6 education real estate course or courses provided for in this section. In 7 establishing the requirements for the continuing education course or 8 courses, the secretary of state shall permit alternatives with respect 9 to content and method of presentation in consideration of the type of 10 brokerage practiced and the availability of the sources of such course 11 or courses in different areas of the state. Each course shall have an 12 established curriculum composed primarily of real estate practice and 13 professional responsibility and ethics and properly prepared written 14 materials of the subject matter which shall be distributed as part of 15 the course. It shall be taught by a qualified faculty with attorneys 16 presenting legal subjects. Credit shall be awarded on the basis of one 17 hour for each sixty minutes of actual attendance and records shall be 18 maintained of attendance at each session which shall be transmitted to 19 the department at the conclusion of the course. Computer-based and 20 distance learning courses may be approved by the department so long as 21 providers demonstrate the ability to monitor and verify participation by 22 the licensee for the specified time period. After an individual's 23 initial licensing term, up to seven excess credit hours of continuing 24 education may be accumulated during any two-year licensing period and 25 carried forward to the next two-year licensing period. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11495-01-5